District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.13

Commitment by Marshal.

Nothing in §§ 24-201.12 and 24-201.15 shall be construed to impair or interfere with the authority of the Marshal of the District to commit persons to the Jail or to produce them in open court or before any judicial officer when thereto required.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1379, ch. 854, § 1193
This section is referenced in § 24-201.14.
1981 Ed., § 24-413.
1973 Ed., § 24-413.